Washington statutes.
RCW 9.94.049

"Correctional institution" and "state correctional institution" defined.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1815-S.SL) ***

(1) For the purposes of this chapter, the term "correctional institution" means any place designated by law for the keeping of persons held in custody under process of law, or under lawful arrest, including state prisons, county and local jails, juvenile detention centers, and other facilities operated by the department of corrections, department of children, youth, and families, or local governmental units primarily for the purposes of punishment, correction, or rehabilitation following conviction or adjudication of a criminal offense.

(2) For the purposes of RCW 9.94.043 and 9.94.045, "state correctional institution" means all state correctional facilities under the supervision of the secretary of the department of corrections used solely for the purpose of confinement of convicted felons.

[2021 c 243 s 5; 1995 c 314 s 6; 1992 c 7 s 21; 1985 c 350 s 3; 1979 c 121 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—2021 c 243: See note following RCW 74.09.670.